apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
    <pardef n="rzecz/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
    <pardef n="rzecz/pospolita__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pospolita</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolitej</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolitej</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolitej</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolitej</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pospolitą</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąpospolitą</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolitą</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolitej</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolitej</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolita</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolita</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolite</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolite</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolite</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolite</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ompospolitym</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolitym</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolite</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolite</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amipospolitymi</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolitymi</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolitych</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolitych</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypospolite</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pospolite</l>
          <r>pospolita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="lekar/z__n">
      <!-- Generate the male form -->
      <e><i>z</i><par n="lekarz/__n"/></e>
      <!-- Generate the female form -->
      <e><i/><par n="lekar/ka__n"/></e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="mistrz/__n">
      <!-- Generate the male form -->
      <e><i/><par n="lekarz/__n"/></e>
      <!-- Generate the female form -->
      <e><i>y</i><par n="gospody/ni__n"/></e>
     </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="lekarz"><i>lekar</i><par n="lekar/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baletmistrz"><i>baletmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="burmistrz"><i>burmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chórmistrz"><i>chórmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kapelmistrz"><i>kapelmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuchmistrz"><i>kuchmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kwatermistrz"><i>kwatermistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mistrz"><i>mistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rotmistrz"><i>rotmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sztukmistrz"><i>sztukmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wicemistrz"><i>wicemistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zegarmistrz"><i>zegarmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rachmistrz"><i>rachmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arcymistrz"><i>arcymistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fechmistrz"><i>fechmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="żaglomistrz"><i>żaglomistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nadburmistrz"><i>nadburmistrz</i><par n="mistrz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rzecz"><i>rzecz</i><par n="rzecz/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rzeczpospolita"><i>rzecz</i><par n="rzecz/pospolita__n"/></e>
